Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ALCOHOL SERVICE PERMITS
SECTION 1.  ORS 471.175 is amended to read:
471.175. (1) The holder of a full on-premises sales license may sell by the  drink at retail wine,
malt beverages, cider and distilled liquor. Except as provided in this section and  ORS 471.176, all
alcoholic beverages sold under a full on-premises sales  license must be consumed on the licensed
premises.
(2) A full on-premises sales license may be issued only to a:
(a) Nonprofit private club, as described in subsection (11) of this section.
(b) Public passenger carrier as provided in ORS 471.182.
(c) Commercial establishment, as defined in ORS 471.001 (2).
(d) Public location that does not qualify for licensing under paragraphs  (a) to (c) of this sub-
section if:
(A) Food is cooked and served at the location;
(B) The predominant business activity at the location is other than the  preparation or serving
of food or the serving of alcohol; and
(C) The location meets any minimum food service  requirements established by Oregon Liquor
and Cannabis Commission rule.
(e) Caterer, subject to the requirements of ORS 471.184.
(3) The holder  of a full on-premises sales license shall allow a patron to remove a partially
consumed bottle of wine from  the licensed premises if the wine is served in conjunction with the
patron’s meal, the patron is not a minor and the patron is not visibly intoxicated.
(4) The holder of a  full on-premises sales license may purchase any distilled liquor from an agent
of the commission appointed pursuant to ORS 471.750  at a discount of not more than five percent
off the regular listed price fixed by the commission, together with all  taxes, in a manner prescribed
by commission rule. For purposes of compensation  by the commission, the appointed agent shall be
credited with such sales at full retail cost. The  commission may not require the licensee to purchase
more than one container of distilled liquor at a time if the distilled liquor:
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 1
(a) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section, has a retail sales price of $30 or  more
per container;
(b) Is available through a distributor in the United States that does  not require the commission
to acquire more than one case of the distilled liquor in a single transaction;
(c) Is not regularly stocked by the commission; and
(d) Is ordered in a 750 milliliter container size if available in that size.
(5) The holder of a full on-premises sales license may purchase distilled liquor only  from a retail
sales agent of the commission or from another  person licensed under this section who has purchased
the distilled liquor from a retail sales agent of the commission.
(6) The  holder of a full on-premises sales license may purchase for sale at retail malt beverages,
wine and cider only from a holder of a license or permit issued by the commission  that authorizes
sales of malt beverages, wine or cider at wholesale to licensees of the commission.
(7) The holder of a full on-premises sales license may sell for consumption off  the licensed
premises malt beverages, wine and cider  in securely covered containers provided by the consumer
that have capacities of not more than two gallons each.
(8) The holder of a full on-premises sales license may sell for consumption off  the licensed
premises malt beverages, wine and cider in factory-sealed containers.
(9)(a) The holder of a  full on-premises sales license may deliver malt beverages, wine and cider
that are sold for off-premises consumption under the privileges of the license to retail customers  in
this state without a  direct shipper permit issued under ORS 471.282. Any deliveries by the licensee
are subject to any rules adopted  by the commission relating to deliveries made under this sub-
section.
(b) The holder of a full on-premises sales license  that uses a third-party delivery facilitator to
make deliveries under this subsection is not responsible for ensuring  that the deliveries made by the
third-party delivery facilitator meet any requirements applicable to the deliveries.
(10) On or before the 20th day of each month, the holder of a full on-premises sales  license shall
submit to the commission a report showing the quantity of malt beverages, wine  or cider received
from the holder of a  direct to retailer permit issued under ORS 471.274 during the immediately
preceding calendar month, and any other information required by the commission by rule.
(11) A nonprofit private club,  including but not limited to a fraternal or veterans organization,
may qualify for  a full on-premises sales license under this section only if the club meets any mini-
mum membership, nonprofit status and food service requirements established by commission rule.
(12) Beginning January 1, 2017, the commission may annually adjust the price  threshold estab-
lished in subsection (4)(a)  of this section by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West  Region (All Items), as published by the Bu-
reau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.  However, the commission may
not adjust the price threshold to be less than $30.
(13) An applicant for a full on-premises sale license that intends to  offer alcoholic
beverages for consumption on the licensed premises shall at the time of application  apply for
a service permit under ORS 471.375.
[(13)] (14) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 471.178 is amended to read:
471.178. (1) The holder  of a limited on-premises sales license may sell by the drink at retail wine,
malt beverages and cider. Except as provided in this section,  all alcoholic beverages sold under a
limited on-premises sales license must be consumed on the licensed premises.
(2) The holder of a limited on-premises sales license may sell malt beverages, wine and  cider in
factory-sealed containers for consumption off the licensed premises.
(3) The holder of a limited  on-premises sales license may sell for consumption off the licensed
premises malt beverages, wine and cider  in securely covered containers provided by the consumer
and that have capacities of not more than two gallons each.
(4)(a) The holder of a  limited on-premises sales license may deliver malt beverages, wine and
cider  that  are sold for off-premises consumption under the privileges of the license to retail cus-
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 2
tomers in this state without a direct shipper permit issued under ORS 471.282.  Any deliveries by the
holder of a limited on-premises sales license are subject to any rules adopted by the  commission
relating to deliveries made under this subsection.
(b) The holder of a limited on-premises sales license that uses a third-party delivery  facilitator
to make deliveries under this subsection is not responsible for ensuring that  the deliveries made by
the third-party delivery facilitator meet any requirements applicable to the deliveries.
(5) The holder of a limited on-premises  sales license shall allow a patron to remove a partially
consumed bottle of wine from  the licensed premises if the wine is served in conjunction with the
patron’s meal, the patron is not a minor and the patron is not visibly intoxicated.
(6) The holder of a limited on-premises sales  license may purchase for sale at retail malt
beverages,  wine  and cider only from the holder of a license or permit issued by the commission that
authorizes sales of malt beverages, wine or cider at wholesale to licensees of the commission.
(7) On or before the 20th day of each month,  the holder of a limited on-premises sales license
shall submit to the commission a report showing the quantity of malt beverages,  wine or cider re-
ceived from the  holder of a direct to retailer permit issued under ORS 471.274 during the imme-
diately preceding calendar month, and any other information required by the commission by rule.
(8) An applicant for a limited on-premises sale license that intends to offer alcoholic
beverages for consumption on the licensed premises shall at the time of application  apply for
a service permit under ORS 471.375.
[(8)] (9) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.  ORS 471.190 is amended to read:
471.190. (1) The holder of a temporary sales license may  sell:
(a) [ Sell] At retail by the drink wine, malt beverages, cider and distilled liquor.
(b) [ Sell] For consumption off the  licensed premises wine, malt beverages and cider in factory-
sealed containers.
(c) [ Sell] For consumption off  the licensed premises wine, malt beverages and cider in securely
covered containers supplied by the consumer and  having capacities of not more than two gallons
each.
(2) Distilled liquor served by the holder of a temporary sales license must  be purchased from a
retail sales agent  of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission. The holder of a temporary sales
license must provide food service as required by commission rule.
(3) A temporary sales license may be issued only to:
(a) Nonprofit or charitable organizations that are registered with the state.
(b) A political committee that has filed a statement of organization  under ORS 260.039 or
260.042.
(c) State agencies.
(d) Local governments, and agencies and departments of local governments.
(e) Persons not otherwise described in this subsection, as long as the applicant submits a plan
that is  approved by the commission detailing how minors will be prevented from gaining access to
alcoholic beverages and how minors  will be prevented from gaining access to any portion of the li-
censed premises prohibited to minors under ORS  471.430 (3) or any rule adopted by the commission.
(4) The commission may by  rule establish additional eligibility requirements for temporary sales
licenses.
(5) Subject to such  qualifications as the commission may establish by rule, persons who hold a
full or limited on-premises sales license are eligible for temporary sales licenses.
(6) A temporary sales license  issued to a person described in subsection (3)(a), (c) or (d) of this
section authorizes the holder of the temporary sales license to:
(a)(A)(i) Have  on a single licensed premises more than one location at which wine, malt
beverages or cider is sold at retail by the drink or for consumption off the licensed premises; and
(ii) Have on  a single licensed premises more than one location at which wine, malt beverages,
cider or distilled liquor is sold at retail by the drink; or
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 3
(B) Have up to three separate premises in this state licensed under the temporary sales  license
at which wine, malt beverages or cider is sold for consumption off the licensed premises; and
(b) Operate for up to 30 days, whether or not the days are consecutive.
(7) The commission may adopt rules to carry out subsection (6) of this section.
(8) A person holding a temporary sales  license is not required to obtain an intermittent tempo-
rary restaurant, seasonal temporary restaurant, single-event temporary  restaurant license or mobile
unit license under ORS chapter 624 if only wine, malt beverages and cider in  single-service con-
tainers are served and only nonperishable food items that are exempted from  licensure by the
Oregon Health Authority are served.
(9) Employees and volunteers serving alcoholic beverages for a  nonprofit or charitable organ-
ization licensed under this section are not required to  have service permits or temporary service
permits or to complete an alcohol server education  program and examination under ORS 471.542.
The commission by rule may establish  education requirements for servers described in this sub-
section.
(10) Notwithstanding ORS 471.392 to 471.400, a temporary sales license may be issued to  a
nonprofit trade association that has a membership primarily composed of persons that hold  winery
licenses issued under ORS 471.223 or grower sales privilege licenses issued under ORS 471.227.
(11) The holder of a temporary sales license that uses a third-party delivery facilitator to make
deliveries on behalf of the holder is  not responsible for ensuring that deliveries made by the third-
party delivery facilitator meet any requirements applicable to the deliveries.
(12)(a) The holder of a temporary sales license may purchase for sale at retail  malt beverages,
wine and cider only  from the holder of a license or permit issued by the commission that authorizes
sales of malt beverages, wine or cider at wholesale to licensees of the commission.
(b) The holder of a temporary sales license that  is an entity described in subsection (3)(a) to (d)
of this section may accept donations of malt beverages, wine or cider  in accordance with rules
adopted by the commission.
(13) On or before the 20th day of each month, the  holder of a temporary sales license shall
submit to the commission a report showing the quantity of malt beverages, wine  or cider received
from the holder of a  direct to retailer permit issued under ORS 471.274 during the immediately
preceding calendar month, and any other information required by the commission by rule.
(14) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 471.200 is amended to read:
471.200. (1) A brewery-public house license allows the licensee to:
(a) Manufacture on the licensed premises, store, transport, sell to  wholesale malt beverage and
wine licensees of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission and export malt beverages;
(b) Sell malt beverages  manufactured on or off the licensed premises at retail for consumption
on or off the premises;
(c) Sell malt beverages in brewery-sealed packages at retail directly to the consumer  for con-
sumption off the premises;
(d) Sell on the licensed premises at retail malt beverages manufactured on or off the  licensed
premises in unpasteurized or  pasteurized form directly to the consumer for consumption off the
premises, delivery of which may be made  in a securely covered container supplied by the consumer;
(e) Sell wine and cider at retail for consumption on or off the premises;
(f) Sell for consumption off the premises wines and cider  in securely covered containers supplied
by the consumer and having capacities of not more than two gallons each;
(g) Conduct the activities, except manufacturing,  described in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this sub-
section at two locations other than the premises where the manufacturing occurs;
(h) Obtain a special events brewery-public house license entitling the holder to  conduct the ac-
tivities allowed under paragraphs (b) to (f) of this subsection at a designated  location other than the
location set forth in the brewery-public house license for a period not exceeding five days;
(i) Distribute malt beverages manufactured at the licensed premises to any other  premises li-
censed to the same licensee, whether a manufacturer, wholesaler or retail premises; and
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 4
(j) Distribute for export, in any amount, malt beverages manufactured at the licensed premises.
(2) In addition to the privileges specified in subsection  (1) of this section, in any calendar year
a brewery-public house licensee may sell at wholesale and distribute to licensees  of the commission
no more than 7,500 barrels of malt beverages produced by the brewery-public house licensee.
(3) A brewery-public house licensee, or  any person having an interest in the licensee, is a retail
licensee for the purposes of  ORS 471.394 and, except as otherwise provided by this section and ORS
471.396, may not acquire or hold any right, title, lien, claim or  other interest, financial or otherwise,
in, upon or to the premises, equipment,  business or merchandise of any manufacturer or wholesaler,
as defined in ORS 471.392. A brewery-public  house licensee, or any person having an interest in the
licensee, is also a manufacturer for the purposes of ORS  471.394 and, except as otherwise provided
by this section and ORS 471.396, may not acquire or hold any right, title, lien, claim or other in-
terest, financial or otherwise, in, upon or  to the premises, equipment, business or merchandise of
any other retail licensee, as defined in ORS 471.392.
(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, a brewery-public house licensee,  or any person
having an interest in the licensee, is a retail licensee for the purposes of ORS 471.398 and, except
as otherwise provided by  this section and ORS 471.400, may not accept directly or indirectly any
financial assistance described in ORS 471.398 from any  manufacturer or wholesaler, as defined in
ORS 471.392. A brewery-public  house licensee, or any person having an interest in the licensee, is
also a manufacturer for the purposes of ORS 471.398 and,  except as otherwise provided by this
section and ORS 471.400, may not provide  directly or indirectly any financial assistance described
in ORS 471.398 to any retail licensee, as defined in  ORS 471.392. The prohibitions on financial as-
sistance in ORS 471.398 do not apply to financial assistance between  manufacturing and retail
businesses licensed to the same person under the provisions of this section.
(b) The commission may issue more than one brewery-public  house license at a single premises
if each licensee:
(A) Has a valid Brewer’s Notice  issued by the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bu-
reau at the premises address; and
(B) Otherwise complies with ORS 471.398.
(c) A  brewery-public house licensee may produce malt beverages for another brewery-public
house licensee under  a custom order agreement. The commission may adopt rules regarding the
contents of custom order agreements.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection  (3) of this section, a brewery-public house licensee, or any person
having an  interest in the licensee, may also hold a winery license authorized by ORS 471.223. A
brewery-public  house  licensee, or any person having an interest in the licensee, may also hold a
warehouse license authorized by ORS 471.242.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this  section, a brewery-public house licensee is eligible for
limited on-premises sales licenses and temporary sales licenses.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection  (3) of this section, a brewery-public house licensee, or any person
having an interest in the  licensee, may also hold a full on-premises sales license. If a person holds
both a brewery-public house license and a full on-premises sales license, nothing in this chapter shall
prevent the sale by the licensee of both distilled liquor and  malt beverages manufactured under the
brewery-public house license.
(8) Notwithstanding any other  provision of this chapter, a brewery-public house licensee, or any
person having an interest in the licensee, may also hold a  distillery license. No provision of this
chapter prevents a brewery-public house licensee that also  holds a distillery license from being ap-
pointed by the commission as the  distillery’s retail outlet agent for the purpose of selling distilled
liquors under ORS 471.230.
(9) Notwithstanding  subsection (3) of this section, the commission by rule may authorize a
brewery-public house licensee to coproduce special events with other manufacturers.
(10)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section,  a brewery-public house licensee may hold,
directly or indirectly, an interest  in a manufacturer or wholesaler, provided that the interest does
not result in exercise of control over, or participation in the management of, the manufacturer’s  or
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 5
wholesaler’s business or business decisions and does not  result in exclusion of any competitor’s
brand of alcoholic liquor.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section,  a manufacturer or wholesaler, and any officer,
director or substantial stockholder of any corporate manufacturer or wholesaler, may  hold, directly
or indirectly,  an interest in a brewery-public house licensee, provided that the interest does not re-
sult in exercise of control over, or participation in the  management of, the licensee’s business or
business decisions and does not result in exclusion of any competitor’s brand of alcoholic liquor.
(11) A brewery-public house licensee may purchase for sale at retail:
(a) Wine and cider only from the holder of a license or permit issued by the commission  that
authorizes the sale of wine or cider at wholesale to licensees of the commission; and
(b) Malt beverages not manufactured by the brewery-public house licensee  only from the holder
of a license or permit issued  by the commission that authorizes the sale of malt beverages at
wholesale to licensees of the commission.
(12) On or before the 20th  day of each month, a brewery-public house licensee shall submit to
the commission a report showing the quantity of malt beverages, wine or cider received from  the
holder of a direct to retailer permit  issued under ORS 471.274 during the immediately preceding
calendar month, and any other information required by the commission by rule.
(13) For purposes of ORS chapter 473, a brewery-public  house licensee shall be considered to
be a manufacturer.
(14) The holder of a brewery-public house license that uses a third-party delivery  facilitator to
make deliveries on behalf  of the holder is not responsible for ensuring that deliveries made by the
third-party delivery facilitator meet any requirements applicable to the deliveries.
(15) An applicant for  a brewery-public house license that intends to offer alcoholic
beverages for consumption on the licensed premises shall at the time of application  apply for
a service permit under ORS 471.375.
[(15)] (16) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 471.221 is amended to read:
471.221. (1) As used in this section, “common control” means:
(a) That  a manufacturer, or any officer, director, substantial stockholder or other substantial
equity holder in the manufacturer:
(A) Directly or indirectly holds 50 percent or more interest in the brewery licensee; or
(B) Has authority to direct the management of the brewery licensee; or
(b) That a brewery licensee, or any officer, director, substantial  stockholder or other substantial
equity holder in the brewery licensee:
(A) Directly or indirectly holds 50 percent or more interest in another manufacturer; or
(B) Has authority to direct the management of another manufacturer.
(2) A brewery license authorizes the licensee to:
(a) Manufacture malt beverages on the licensed premises.
(b) Sell to wholesale malt beverage and wine licensees, import, store, transport or export:
(A) Malt beverages produced on the licensed premises; or
(B) Malt beverages of a brand produced by a manufacturer that is under  common control with
the brewery licensee.
(c) Sell wine, malt beverages  or cider on the licensed premises at retail for consumption on or
off the licensed premises.
(d) Sell, in securely covered containers supplied by the consumer and having a  capacity of not
more than two gallons each, wine, malt beverages or cider for off-premises consumption.
(e) Obtain a special events brewery license that entitles the  holder to conduct the activities
allowed  under  paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection at a designated location other than the one
set forth in the brewery license for a period not exceeding five days.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS 471.392 to 471.400, subject to ORS 471.175, hold  a full on-premises sales
license.
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 6
(g) Conduct any activities authorized under paragraph (c), (d) or (f) of this subsection at up to
two additional locations approved by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(3) Subject  to ORS 471.235, a brewery licensee may hold a wholesale malt beverage and wine
license. A brewery licensee must hold a wholesale malt beverage and wine license if the brewery
licensee:
(a) Imports, stores, transports or  exports malt beverages of brands that are not produced by the
licensee or a manufacturer under common control with the licensee; or
(b) Except as provided in  this paragraph, sells or distributes malt beverages. This paragraph
does not apply to malt beverages described in subsection (2)(a)  or (b) of this section sold at a li-
censed premises described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(4) A brewery licensee and a winery  licensee may not be under common control unless the
winery licensee:
(a) Uses its premises to produce wine or cider; and
(b) Holds a valid producer and blender basic permit issued by  the federal Alcohol and Tobacco
Tax and Trade Bureau.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,  a brewery licensee, a manufacturer that
is under  common control with the brewery licensee or any officer, director, substantial stockholder
or other substantial equity holder in  the brewery licensee or in a manufacturer that is under com-
mon control  with the brewery licensee may not sell malt beverages at retail at more than three lo-
cations in this state regardless of the number or type of licenses held by the  licensee, manufacturer,
officer, director, stockholder or equity holder.
(6) A brewery licensee may produce malt  beverages for a brewery-public house licensee under
a custom order agreement. The commission may adopt  rules regarding the contents of custom order
agreements.
(7) A brewery licensee that uses  a third-party delivery facilitator to make deliveries on behalf
of the licensee is  not responsible for ensuring that deliveries made by the third-party delivery
facilitator meet any requirements applicable to the deliveries.
(8)(a) An applicant for  a brewery license that intends to offer alcoholic beverages for
consumption on the licensed premises shall at the time of application apply for a service
permit under ORS 471.375.
(b) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 471.223 is amended to read:
471.223. (1) As used in this section, “control” means that the licensee:
(a) Owns the brand under which the wine or cider is labeled; or
(b) Performs or has  the legal right to perform all of the acts common to a brand owner under
the terms of a trademark license  or similar agreement that for the brand under which the wine or
cider is labeled has a term of at least three years.
(2) The holder of a winery license may:
(a) Import wine or cider in containers that have a capacity of more than four liters.
(b) Import  wine or cider in containers that have a capacity of four liters or less if the brand
of wine or cider is under the control of the licensee.
(c) Bottle, produce, blend, store, transport or export wines or cider.
(d) Sell wines or cider at wholesale to the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission or to
licensees of the commission.
(e) Sell wines or cider at retail directly to the consumer for consumption on or off the licensed
premises.
(f) Sell malt beverages at retail for consumption on or off the licensed premises.
(g) Sell  for consumption off the premises malt beverages, wines and cider in securely covered
containers  that  are supplied by the consumer and have capacities of not more than two gallons each.
(h) Conduct under the winery  license any activities described in paragraphs (a) to (g) of this
subsection at five or fewer premises designated by the commission.
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 7
(i) Purchase from or through the commission brandy or other distilled liquors for  fortifying
wines or cider.
(j) Obtain a special events winery license that entitles the  holder to conduct the activities al-
lowed under paragraphs (e) to (g) of this subsection at a designated location other  than the one set
forth in the winery license for a period not to exceed five days.
(3) A winery licensee shall allow a patron to remove a partially consumed bottle of wine from
the licensed premises if the patron is not a minor and the patron is not visibly intoxicated.
(4) Except as provided in subsection  (5) of this section, in order to hold a winery license the
licensee shall:
(a) Possess at  a bonded premises within Oregon a valid producer and blender basic permit issued
by the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau; or
(b) Possess a valid wine blender or valid wholesaler  basic permit issued by the federal Alcohol
and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau and have a written contract with a winery licensed under par-
agraph (a) of this subsection that authorizes the winery to  produce for the licensee a brand of wine
or cider that is under the control of the licensee.
(5) Subsection (4) of this section does not apply if a licensee produces only cider under the
winery license.
(6) A winery licensee may  sell and ship malt beverages, wine or cider directly to a resident of
this state only if the licensee has a direct shipper permit issued under ORS 471.282.
(7) A winery licensee, or any person having an interest in the licensee, may also hold a  full
on-premises sales license. If a winery licensee, or a person having an interest in the licensee,  also
holds a full on-premises sales license, the provisions of this chapter do not prevent  the licensee or
person from both selling wine or cider bottled and produced under the winery license and  selling
alcoholic liquor as authorized under the full on-premises sales license.
(8) More than one winery licensee may exercise the privileges of a winery  license at a single
location. The commission may  not refuse to issue a winery license to a person for the production
of wine or cider on specified premises based on the fact that other winery licensees  also produce
wine or cider on those premises.
(9) If  a winery licensee does not possess at a bonded premises within Oregon a valid producer
and blender basic permit issued by the  federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau, the
licensee  may  exercise the privileges described in this section only for wine and cider brands that
are under the control of the licensee.
(10) The holder of a winery license that uses a third-party delivery  facilitator to make deliveries
on behalf of the winery licensee is not responsible for ensuring that  deliveries made by the third-
party delivery facilitator meet any requirements applicable to the deliveries.
(11)(a) An applicant for a winery  license that intends to offer alcoholic beverages for
consumption on the  premises shall at the time of application apply for a service permit under
ORS 471.375.
(b) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 471.227 is amended to read:
471.227. (1) A grower sales privilege license [ shall allow ] allows  the  licensee to perform the
following activities only for fruit or grape wine or cider  where all of the fruit or grapes used to
make the wine or cider are grown in Oregon under the control of the licensee to:
(a) Import, store, transport or export [ such] the wines or cider.
(b) Sell [ such] the wines or cider  at wholesale to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission
or licensees of the commission.
(c) Sell [ such] the wines or cider  at retail directly to the consumer for consumption on or off
the licensed premises.
(d) Sell at retail for consumption off the licensed premises malt beverages and [ such] the wines
and cider in securely covered containers  provided by the consumer and having capacities of not
more than two gallons each.
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 8
(e) Conduct some or all of the activities allowed under paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection
at a second or third premises as may be designated by the commission.
(f) Obtain a special events grower sales privilege license [ which shall  entitle ] that entitles  the
holder to conduct  the activities allowed under paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection at a desig-
nated location other than the one set forth in the grower sales privilege license for a  period not to
exceed five days.
(2) A grower sales privilege  licensee shall allow a patron to remove a partially consumed bottle
of wine from the licensed premises if the patron is not a minor and  the patron is not visibly
intoxicated.
(3) For purposes of ORS 471.392 to 471.400, a grower sales privilege licensee shall be  considered
a manufacturer.
(4) A person holding a winery license in another state is not eligible for a license  under this
section.
(5) A person licensed under this section  is not eligible for a limited on-premises sales license
or an off-premises sales license.
(6) As used in this section, “control” means the grower either owns the  land upon which the
fruit or grapes are grown or has a legal right to perform  or does perform all of the acts common
to fruit farming or viticulture under terms of a lease or similar agreement of at  least three years’
duration.
(7) For the purposes of tax reporting, payment and record keeping, the provisions of law  that
[shall] apply to  a manufacturer under ORS chapter 473 [ shall] apply to a grower sales privilege
licensee, but [ such a licensee ] a grower sales privilege licensee  is not a manufacturer for purposes
of ORS 473.050 (5).
(8) A grower sales privilege licensee that uses a  third-party delivery facilitator to make deliv-
eries on behalf of the licensee is not responsible for ensuring that  deliveries made by the third-party
delivery facilitator meet any requirements applicable to the deliveries.
(9)(a) An applicant for  a grower sales privilege license that intends to offer alcoholic
beverages for consumption on the licensed premises shall at the time of application  apply for
a service permit under ORS 471.375.
(b) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 471.313 is amended to read:
471.313. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may refuse to issue a license,  or may
issue a  restricted license, to any applicant under the provisions of this chapter if the commission
has reasonable ground to believe any of the following to be true:
(a) That there are sufficient licensed premises in the locality set out in the application, or  that
the granting of a license in the locality set out in the application is  not demanded by public interest
or convenience. In determining whether there are sufficient licensed premises  in the locality, the
commission shall consider seasonal fluctuations in the population  of the locality and shall ensure
that there are adequate licensed premises to serve  the needs of the locality during the peak seasons.
(b) That the applicant has not furnished an acceptable bond as required  by ORS 471.311 or is
not maintaining the insurance or bond required by ORS 471.168.
(c) That, except as allowed by ORS 471.392 to 471.400, any applicant to sell at retail for con-
sumption on the premises has been financed or furnished with money or  property by, or has any
connection with, or is a manufacturer of, or wholesale dealer in, alcoholic liquor.
(d) That the applicant:
(A) Is in the habit of using alcoholic beverages, habit-forming drugs  or controlled substances to
excess.
(B) Has made false statements to the commission.
(C) Is incompetent or physically unable to  carry on the management of the establishment pro-
posed to be licensed.
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 9
(D) Has been convicted of violating a general or local law of this state or another  state, or of
violating a federal law, if the conviction is substantially related to the fitness and  ability of the
applicant to lawfully carry out activities under the license.
(E) Has maintained an insanitary establishment.
(F) Is not of good repute and moral character.
(G) Has failed to comply with ORS 459A.700 to  459A.744, 474.005 to 474.095, 474.115, 475C.005
to 475C.525, 475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.770 to 475C.919 or this chapter or  ORS chapter 473 or
rules adopted by the commission pursuant to ORS 459A.700 to  459A.744, 474.005 to 474.095, 474.115,
475C.005 to 475C.525,  475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.770 to 475C.919 or this chapter or ORS chapter
473.
(H) Is not the legitimate owner of the business proposed to be licensed, or other persons  have
ownership interests in the business which have not been disclosed.
(I) Is not  possessed of or has not demonstrated financial responsibility sufficient to adequately
meet the requirements of the business proposed to be licensed.
(J) Is unable to read or write the English language  or to understand the laws of Oregon relating
to alcoholic liquor or the rules of the commission.
(e) That there is a history of  serious and persistent problems involving disturbances, lewd or
unlawful activities or noise either in the premises proposed to  be licensed or involving patrons of
the establishment in the immediate vicinity of  the premises if the activities in the immediate vicinity
of the premises are related to the sale or service of alcohol under the exercise of the  license privi-
lege. Behavior that is grounds for refusal of a license under this section, where so related to the
sale or service of alcohol,  includes, but is not limited to obtrusive or excessive noise, music or sound
vibrations; public drunkenness; fights; altercations;  harassment; unlawful drug sales; alcohol or re-
lated litter; trespassing on private property; and public  urination. Histories from premises currently
or previously operated by the applicant may be considered when reasonable  inference may be made
that similar activities will occur as to the premises proposed to be licensed. The applicant may
overcome the history by showing  that the problems are not serious or persistent or that the appli-
cant demonstrates a willingness and ability to control adequately the premises  proposed to be li-
censed and patrons’ behavior in  the immediate vicinity of the premises that is related to the
licensee’s sale or service of alcohol under the licensee’s exercise of the license privilege.
(f) If the application is for a license that authorizes the sale or  service of alcoholic
beverages for consumption on the premises and the applicant  intends to offer the sale or
service of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, that  the applicant does not
hold a valid service permit or temporary service  permit issued under ORS 471.375 and has
not designated an individual who:
(A) Holds a valid service permit  or temporary service permit issued under ORS 471.375;
and
(B) Exercises, or is entitled to exercise, control or responsibility over setting,  imple-
menting and changing the  applicant’s practices for selling and serving alcoholic beverages
at the premises.
(2) The commission may refuse to issue a certificate under ORS 471.244 or permit under ORS
471.274 or 471.282, or may issue a restricted certificate or permit, if the commission  has reasonable
grounds to believe that the applicant:
(a) Is in the  habit of using alcoholic beverages, habit-forming drugs or controlled substances to
excess.
(b) Has made false statements to the commission.
(c) Has been convicted of violating a general or local law of this state  or another state, or of
violating a federal law,  if the conviction is substantially related to the fitness and ability of the
applicant to lawfully carry out activities related to the certificate or permit.
(d) Has failed to comply with ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744, 474.005 to 474.095, 474.115,  475C.005
to 475C.525, 475C.540 to 475C.586  or 475C.770 to 475C.919 or this chapter or ORS chapter 473 or
rules adopted by the commission pursuant to ORS 459A.700 to  459A.744, 474.005 to 474.095, 474.115,
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 10
475C.005 to 475C.525, 475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.770 to 475C.919 or this chapter or  ORS chapter
473.
(e) Does not have a good record of compliance with the alcoholic liquor laws  and rules of any
other jurisdiction.
SECTION 9.  ORS 471.315 is amended to read:
471.315. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may cancel, suspend, restrict  or re-
quire mandatory training for any license issued  under this chapter, or impose a civil penalty in lieu
of or  in addition to a suspension as provided by ORS 471.322, if the commission finds or has rea-
sonable ground to believe any of the following to be true:
(a) That the licensee:
(A) Has violated any provision of this chapter or ORS  474.115 or any rule of the commission
adopted pursuant thereto.
(B) Has  made any false representation or statement to the commission in order to induce or
prevent action by the commission.
(C) Is not maintaining an acceptable bond as  required by ORS 471.311 or is not maintaining the
insurance or bond required by ORS 471.168.
(D) Has maintained an insanitary establishment.
(E) Is insolvent or incompetent or physically unable to carry on the management of  the estab-
lishment of the licensee.
(F) Is in the habit  of using alcoholic liquor, habit-forming drugs or controlled substances to ex-
cess.
(G) Has knowingly sold  alcoholic liquor to persons under 21 years of age or to persons visibly
intoxicated at the time of sale.
(H) Has allowed the consumption of alcoholic liquor on the licensed  premises by a person who
is visibly intoxicated at the time of consumption.
(I) Has misrepresented to a customer or the public any alcoholic liquor sold by the licensee.
(J) Since the granting of the license, has been convicted of a felony, of violating any of the liq-
uor laws of this state, general or local, or of any misdemeanor  or violation of any municipal ordi-
nance committed on the licensed premises.
(K) If the license authorizes the sale or service of alcoholic beverages for  consumption
on the premises and the licensee  offers the sale or service of alcoholic beverages for con-
sumption on the premises, that the  licensee does not hold a valid service permit or tempo-
rary service permit issued under ORS 471.375 and has not designated an individual who:
(i) Holds a valid service permit or  temporary service permit issued under ORS 471.375;
and
(ii) Exercises, or is entitled to  exercise, control or responsibility over setting, imple-
menting and changing the licensee’s practices for selling and serving alcoholic beverages at
the premises.
(b) That any person licensed to sell at retail for consumption on the premises is  acting as an
agent of, or is a manufacturer or wholesaler of alcoholic  liquors, or has borrowed money or prop-
erty, or has accepted gratuities  or rebates, or has obtained the use of equipment from any man-
ufacturer or wholesaler of alcoholic liquor or any agent thereof.
(c) That there is a history of  serious and persistent problems involving disturbances, lewd or
unlawful activities or noise either in the premises or involving patrons of the establishment  in the
immediate vicinity of the premises if the activities in the immediate vicinity  of the premises are
related to the sale or service of alcohol under the  exercise of the license privilege. Behavior that
is grounds for cancellation  or suspension of a license under this section, where so related to the sale
or service of alcohol, includes but is not limited to obtrusive or excessive noise, music or sound vi-
brations; public drunkenness; fights;  altercations; harassment or unlawful drug sales; alcohol or re-
lated litter; trespassing on private property; and public  urination. Mitigating factors include a
showing by the licensee that the problems are not serious or persistent or that the  licensee has
demonstrated a willingness and  ability to control adequately the licensed premises and patrons’ be-
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 11
havior in  the immediate vicinity of the premises which is related to the licensee’s sale or service
of alcohol under the licensee’s exercise of the license privilege.
(d) That there is any other reason that, in the opinion  of the commission, based on public con-
venience or necessity, warrants canceling or suspending such license.
(2) The commission may cancel, suspend or restrict a certificate issued under ORS  471.244 or
permit issued under ORS 471.274 or 471.282,  or impose a civil penalty in lieu of or in addition to a
suspension of a certificate or permit as provided by  ORS 471.327, if the commission has reasonable
grounds to believe that the certificate or permit holder:
(a) Is in the  habit of using alcoholic beverages, habit-forming drugs or controlled substances to
excess.
(b) Has made false statements to the commission.
(c) Has been convicted of violating a general or local law of this state  or another state, or of
violating a federal law,  if the conviction is substantially related to the fitness and ability of the
applicant to lawfully carry out activities related to the certificate or permit.
(d) Has failed to comply with ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744, 474.005 to 474.095, 474.115,  475C.005
to 475C.525, 475C.540 to 475C.586  or 475C.770 to 475C.919 or this chapter or ORS chapter 473 or
rules adopted by the commission pursuant to ORS 459A.700 to  459A.744, 474.005 to 474.095, 474.115,
475C.005 to 475C.525, 475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.770 to 475C.919 or this chapter or  ORS chapter
473.
(e) Does not have a good record of compliance with the alcoholic liquor laws  and rules of any
other jurisdiction.
(f) Or any officer, agent or employee of the certificate or permit holder, violated any term or
provision of an agreement entered into pursuant to ORS 471.244 or submitted a false or fictitious
report pursuant to the agreement.
(3) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 471.360 is amended to read:
471.360. (1) [Except as otherwise provided in ORS 471.375: ]
[(a)] Any  [ person] individual employed by  or acting on behalf of or at the direction of  a
licensee of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission must have a valid service permit or tem-
porary service permit  issued by the commission if the [ person] individual:
[(A)] (a) Participates in any manner in the mixing, selling or service of alcoholic liquor  for
consumption on the premises where served or sold; [ or]
[(B)] (b) Participates in the dispensing of malt beverages, wines  or cider sold in securely cov-
ered containers provided by the consumer[ .];
(c) Directly supervises an individual described in  paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection;
or
(d) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, is a  licensee who holds, or an applicant for,
a license that authorizes  the sale or service of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the
licensed premises.
(2) The commission may waive  the requirement to hold a valid service permit or tempo-
rary service permit for an individual described in subsection  (1)(d) of this section if the in-
dividual designates another individual who:
(a) Holds a valid service permit or temporary service permit; and
(b) Exercises control or responsibility, or is  entitled to exercise control or responsibility,
over setting, implementing and changing the licensee’s practices for selling and  serving al-
coholic beverages at the licensed premises.
[(b)] (3) A licensee of the commission [ may not permit any  person who lacks a service permit re-
quired of the person under paragraph (a) of this subsection ] may not allow an individual  who does
not hold a service permit or temporary service permit  required of the individual under sub-
section (1) of this section to :
[(A)] (a) [ To] Mix, sell or serve any alcoholic liquor for consumption on licensed premises; [ or]
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 12
[(B)] (b) [ To] Dispense malt beverages, wines or cider sold in securely covered containers pro-
vided by the consumer[ .]; or
(c) Directly supervise an individual described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
[(c)] (4) A permittee shall  make the service permit or temporary service permit  available at
any time while on duty for immediate inspection by  any regulatory specialist or by any other peace
officer.
[(2) The commission may waive the requirement for a service permit for  an employee of a licensee
whose primary function is not the sale of alcoholic liquor or food, including but not limited  to public
passenger carriers, hospitals, or convalescent, nursing or retirement homes. ]
(5) The commission may  establish by rule a process and conditions under which the
commission may waive the requirement  to hold a service permit or temporary service permit
under subsection (1) of this section.
[(3)] (6) Violation of the requirements of this section is a Class B violation.
SECTION 11.  ORS 471.365 is amended to read:
471.365. (1) A service permit [ shall be ] or a temporary service permit is  a purely  personal
privilege, valid only upon licensed premises, for the period of time stated [ thereon] on the service
permit or temporary  service permit , and may be suspended or revoked for any reason set forth
in ORS 471.360 to 471.385.
(2) [No service permit shall be used by  any person other than the person to whom it is issued ] A
service permit or temporary service permit may not  be used by any individual other than the
individual to whom the  service permit or temporary service permit is issued . [ Except as pro-
vided in ORS 471.375, ] The licensee shall verify the identification  of the permittee and determine
that the permittee has in possession a service permit or temporary service permit  before allowing
the permittee to [ mix, sell or serve alcoholic liquor  for consumption on the licensed premises ] perform
a duty described in ORS 471.360 (3) .
SECTION 12.  ORS 471.375 is amended to read:
471.375. [(1) Any person  who has not had a permit refused or revoked or whose permit is not under
suspension may mix, sell or serve alcoholic beverages as provided under  subsection (3) of this section
if the person prepares in duplicate an application for a service permit prior to mixing, selling or  serv-
ing any alcoholic beverage for consumption on licensed premises. Until a person who has  prepared an
application under this subsection receives a service permit, the licensee for the premises shall make a
copy of the application available for immediate inspection by any regulatory specialist or by any  other
peace officer. ]
[(2) An applicant for a service permit must  be 18 years of age or over. Application for a service
permit shall be made on a  form acceptable to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission. The ap-
plicant shall truly answer all questions, provide any further information required and pay  a fee not to
exceed  $50.]
[(3) An applicant described in subsection (1) of this section may: ]
[(a) Participate in the mixing, selling or service of alcoholic  beverages for consumption on the
premises where served or sold; and ]
[(b) Participate in the dispensing of malt beverages, wine or cider sold  in securely covered con-
tainers provided by the consumer. ]
The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall establish by rule a process for  the
issuance and renewal of a service permit and the issuance of a temporary  service permit.
The rules adopted under this section must include:
(1) Eligibility criteria for the issuance and renewal of a service permit and the issuance
of a temporary service permit;
(2) Fees; and
(3) Requirements  that an applicant for a service permit or temporary service permit be
at least 18 years of age and submit to  the commission an application in a form and manner
acceptable to the commission.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 471.380 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 13
471.380. (1) The Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission may refuse to [ grant] issue a service
permit or temporary service permit, or may issue a restricted  service permit,  if [ it] the
commission has reasonable grounds to believe any of the following to be true:
(a) That the applicant is in the habit of using alcoholic  beverages or controlled substances to
excess.
(b) That the applicant has made false statements to the commission.
(c) That the applicant is incompetent or physically incapable of  performing the duties of a
permittee.
(d) That the applicant has been convicted of violating any of the alcoholic  liquor laws of this
state, general or local, or has been convicted at any time of a felony.
(e) That the applicant has not completed the alcohol server  education course and examination
required by ORS 471.542.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 183.435, an applicant who  seeks review of the refusal of a service
permit or temporary service permit  must request a hearing:
(a) Within 15 days after notification of the refusal, if  the refusal is based on failure to complete
the alcohol server education course and examination; or
(b) Within 30 days after notification of the refusal, if the refusal is based on any grounds  other
than failure to complete the alcohol server education course and examination.
(3) The  refusal to issue a temporary service permit is not a contested case under ORS
chapter 183.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 471.385 is amended to read:
471.385. (1)  The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may revoke , restrict  or suspend a
service permit or a temporary service permit , or impose a civil penalty in lieu of or in addition
to suspension as provided by ORS 471.322, if the  commission finds or has reasonable grounds to
believe any of the following to be true:
(a) That the permittee has made false statements to the commission.
(b) That the permittee has been convicted of a felony, of violating any of the liquor  laws of the
state, general or local, or any misdemeanor or violation  of any municipal ordinance committed on
the licensed premises.
(c) That the permittee  has performed or permitted any act which would constitute a violation
of any provision of this  chapter or any rule of the commission, if the act were performed or per-
mitted by any licensee of the commission.
(d) That the permittee was aware of activities that  the permittee had a duty to report under
ORS 471.271 and the permittee did not report.
(2) The issuance, restriction, suspension or revocation of a  service  permit or temporary ser-
vice permit  under ORS 471.360 to  471.385 does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any
act of an employee on the licensee’s premises.
(3) [When there  has been ] If a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted [ thereunder] under
this chapter occurs  upon any premises licensed by the commission, the commission may revoke ,
restrict or suspend [ either] the service permit or temporary service permit  of the employee who
violated the law or rule [ or], the license of the licensee upon whose premises the violation
occurred[ ,] or both the service permit or temporary service permit  and the license.
(4) The commission may revoke, restrict or suspend a permittee’s service permit  and
may impose a civil penalty for an act or omission of  the permittee that constitutes a reason
described in subsection (1) of this section and that occurred  during the time the permittee
held a temporary service permit.
[(4)] (5) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 471.542 is amended to read:
471.542. (1) [Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, ] The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission shall require [ a person ] an  individual applying for issuance or renewal of a service
permit [ or any license  that authorizes the sale or service of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the
premises] or temporary service permit issued under ORS  471.375 to complete an approved alco-
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 14
hol server education course and examination as a condition of the  issuance or renewal of the permit
[or license].
[(2) A person applying for issuance or renewal  of a license that authorizes the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises need not complete an approved alcohol  server ed-
ucation course and examination as a condition of the issuance or renewal of the license if: ]
[(a) The license has  been restricted by the commission to prohibit sale or service of alcoholic
beverages for consumption on the premises; or ]
[(b) The person applying for issuance or renewal of the license  submits a sworn statement to the
commission stating that the  person will not engage in sale or service of alcoholic beverages for con-
sumption on the premises, will not directly supervise or  manage persons who sell or serve alcoholic
beverages on the premises, and will  not participate in establishing policies governing the sale or service
of alcoholic beverages on the premises. ]
[(3) The commission by rule shall establish requirements that licensees and permittees must comply
with as a condition of requalifying for a license or permit. The licensee  or permittee must comply with
those requirements once  every five years after completing the initial alcohol server education course and
examination. The requirements established by the commission to requalify for a license may  include
retaking the alcohol server education course and examination. The  requirements established by the
commission to requalify for a service permit shall include retaking the alcohol server  education course
and examination. ]
(2) The commission shall by rule establish requirements  for requalification for a service
permit. A permittee shall provide proof to the commission that the permittee has met  the
requirements established under this subsection once every five years after  the permittee
completes the initial alcohol server education course and  examination. The requirements
must include a requirement to  retake the alcohol server education course and pass the ex-
amination.
[(4)] (3) The commission may extend the time [ periods established by ] period described in sub-
section (2) of  this section upon a showing of hardship. [ The commission by rule may exempt a
licensee from the requirements of this section if the licensee does not participate in  the management of
the business. ]
[(5)] (4) The standards and curriculum of alcohol server education courses [ shall] must
include , but are not [ be] limited to , the following:
(a) Alcohol as a drug and its effects on the body and behavior, especially driving ability.
(b) Effects of alcohol in combination with commonly  used legal, prescription or nonprescription,
drugs and illegal drugs.
(c) Recognizing the problem drinker and community treatment programs and agencies.
(d) State  alcohol beverage laws such as prohibition of sale to minors and sale to intoxicated
persons, sale for on-premises or off-premises consumption, hours of operation and penalties for  vio-
lation of the laws.
(e) Drunk driving laws and liquor liability statutes.
(f) Intervention with the problem customer, including ways to cut  off service, ways to deal with
the belligerent customer and alternative means of transportation to get the customer safely home.
(g) Advertising and marketing for safe and responsible drinking patterns and standard  operating
procedures for dealing with customers.
[(6)] (5) The commission shall adopt rules to impose reasonable fees for administrative costs  on
alcohol server education course instructors and providers.
[(7)] (6) The commission shall provide  alcohol server education courses and examinations
through independent contractors, private persons or private  or public schools certified by the com-
mission. The commission shall  adopt rules governing the manner in which alcohol server education
courses and examinations  are made available to [ persons] individuals required to take the [ course]
courses and examinations . In  adopting rules under this subsection, the commission shall consider
alternative means of providing courses, including but not limited  to providing courses through
audiotapes, videotapes, the Internet and other electronic media.
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 15
THIRD-PARTY DELIVERY FACILITATORS
SECTION 16.  ORS 471.534 is amended to read:
471.534. (1) In order to  engage in the delivery of alcoholic beverages, a third-party delivery
facilitator must hold a permit issued by the Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission and must
comply with applicable requirements under this chapter.
(2)(a) The commission may refuse to issue a permit, and may suspend or revoke a permit,  if the
commission finds or has reasonable grounds to believe that:
(A) A third-party delivery facilitator is, or has a financial interest in, a manufacturer;
(B) A third-party  delivery facilitator provided material false or misleading information to the
commission or omitted information that should have been provided to the commission; or
(C) Subject to paragraph  (b) of this subsection, a third-party delivery facilitator, or any person
used by  or acting on behalf or at the direction of the third-party delivery facilitator, does not have
a good record of compliance under this chapter,  as assessed upon initial application for a permit
under this section and annually upon application for renewal of a permit issued under this section.
(b) The commission shall establish by rule a process through which the commission shall notify
a third-party delivery facilitator of a compliance issue as described  under paragraph (a)(A) of this
subsection and allow the third-party delivery facilitator  an opportunity to cure the issue prior to the
commission’s  refusal  to issue or renew the third-party delivery facilitator’s permit under this section.
(3) A retail  licensee, as defined in ORS 471.392, is eligible to qualify as a third-party delivery
facilitator. A retail licensee that is also  a third-party delivery facilitator may exercise any privilege
granted by the retail license.
(4)(a) A third-party delivery facilitator acting on behalf of an eligible business may:
(A) Deliver, or cause to be delivered,  alcoholic beverages to the physical possession of a final
consumer on behalf of an eligible business;
(B) Advertise alcoholic beverages available for retail sale;
(C) Solicit, receive and accept orders for alcoholic beverages from final consumers; and
(D) Receive payment for alcoholic beverages ordered by final consumers.
(b) A third-party  delivery facilitator may engage in an activity described in this section only
when the third-party delivery facilitator is acting on behalf of an eligible business.
(c) A third-party delivery facilitator may use only a delivery person  who meets the requirements
of ORS 471.524 to deliver alcoholic beverages to a final consumer.
(d) A third-party  delivery facilitator that is an individual who is a delivery person must meet
the requirements of ORS 471.524, including the requirement to hold a valid driver license.
(5) A  third-party delivery facilitator may charge an eligible business a fee for delivering alco-
holic beverages on behalf of the eligible business.
(6) A third-party delivery facilitator shall maintain  and make available records to the commis-
sion as required by the commission by rule.
(7)(a) The commission may  adopt rules as necessary to regulate third-party delivery facilitators.
(b) The commission may adopt rules to  establish a fee for issuing and renewing a third-
party delivery facilitator permit under this section.
(8)(a) An eligible business may use a third-party delivery facilitator to carry out, on  behalf of
the eligible business, deliveries of  alcoholic beverages to final consumers that the eligible business
is authorized to make. In carrying out  a delivery described in this subsection, a third-party delivery
facilitator shall ensure that the delivery is made in  compliance with any requirements applicable to
the delivery.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules to carry out this subsection.
(9) An eligible business that uses a third-party delivery facilitator to deliver  alcoholic beverages
on behalf of the  eligible business is not responsible for any failure of the third-party delivery
facilitator, or a delivery person employed by or contracted  with the third-party delivery facilitator,
to comply with the requirements of ORS 471.521 to 471.537 or rules adopted under ORS 471.521 to
471.537.
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 16
CAPTIONS
SECTION 17. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 18. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4138 (HB 4138-A) Page 17